Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.525.025

School facilities citizen advisory panel—Membership—Travel expenses—Technical advisory group.

(1) To maintain citizen oversight on issues pertaining to school facilities and funding for school construction, a school facilities citizen advisory panel shall be created by the state board of education. The panel shall advise and make recommendations to the superintendent of public instruction regarding school facilities, funding for school construction, joint planning and financing of educational facilities, facility plans and programs for nonhigh school districts, and determinations of remote and necessary schools.

(2) The membership of the school facilities citizen advisory panel shall be as follows:

(a) One member of the state board of education;

(b) Two school district directors representing school districts of various sizes and geographic locations, who are appointed by the state board of education and selected from a list of five names submitted to the board by the Washington state school directors' association; and

(c) Four additional citizen members appointed by the state board of education.

(3) Members of the panel shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(4) In addition to the school facilities citizen advisory panel, the superintendent of public instruction may convene a technical advisory group including representatives from school business officers, building and construction contracting and trade organizations, architecture and engineering organizations, and other organizations with expertise in school facilities.

[ 2006 c 263 s 308.]

NOTES:

Findings—Purpose—Part headings not law—2006 c 263: See notes following RCW 28A.150.230.